Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.160

Warrant of imprisonment.

If any fine is imposed against any person for contempt, as hereinbefore provided, he or she shall stand committed to the county jail of the county in which the offense was committed until such fine is paid. The presiding officer of the house, fixing the fine, shall issue a warrant to the sheriff of the county where the offense was committed, commanding him or her to imprison such person in the county jail until such fine is paid, or until he or she has been imprisoned in such jail one day for every three dollars of such fine.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6012; 1895 c 6 s 14; RRS s 8191.]